Illinois, session 104th, HB4500.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.40 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.40)7    Sec. 356z.40. Pregnancy and postpartum coverage.8    (a) An individual or group policy of accident and health 9insurance or managed care plan amended, delivered, issued, or 10renewed on or after October 8, 2021 (the effective date of 11Public Act 102-665) shall provide coverage for pregnancy and 12newborn care in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 18022(b) regarding 13essential health benefits. For policies amended, delivered, 14issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, this 15subsection also applies to coverage for postpartum care.16    (b) Benefits under this Section shall be as follows:17        (1) An individual who has been identified as 18    experiencing a high-risk pregnancy by the individual's 19    treating provider shall have access to clinically 20    appropriate case management programs. As used in this 21    subsection, "case management" means a mechanism to 22    coordinate and assure continuity of services, including, 23    but not limited to, health services, social services, and   HB4500- 2 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    educational services necessary for the individual. "Case 2    management" involves individualized assessment of needs, 3    planning of services, referral, monitoring, and advocacy 4    to assist an individual in gaining access to appropriate 5    services and closure when services are no longer required. 6    "Case management" is an active and collaborative process 7    involving a single qualified case manager, the individual, 8    the individual's family, the providers, and the community. 9    This includes close coordination and involvement with all 10    service providers in the management plan for that 11    individual or family, including assuring that the 12    individual receives the services. As used in this 13    subsection, "high-risk pregnancy" means a pregnancy in 14    which the pregnant or postpartum individual or baby is at 15    an increased risk for poor health or complications during 16    pregnancy or childbirth, including, but not limited to, 17    hypertension disorders, gestational diabetes, and 18    hemorrhage. 19        (2) An individual shall have access to medically 20    necessary treatment of a mental, emotional, nervous, or 21    substance use disorder or condition consistent with the 22    requirements set forth in this Section and in Sections 23    370c and 370c.1 of this Code. Prior authorization 24    requirements are prohibited to the extent provided in 25    Section 370c. 26        (3) The benefits provided for inpatient and outpatient   HB4500- 3 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    services for the medically necessary treatment of a 2    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder or 3    condition related to pregnancy or postpartum complications 4    shall be provided consistent with the requirements of 5    Sections 370c and 370c.1 of this Code. The facility or 6    provider shall notify the insurer of both the admission 7    and the initial treatment plan within 48 hours after 8    admission or initiation of treatment. Subject to the 9    requirements of Sections 370c and 370c.1 of this Code, 10    nothing in this paragraph shall prevent an insurer from 11    applying concurrent and post-service utilization review of 12    health care services, including review of medical 13    necessity, case management, experimental and 14    investigational treatments, managed care provisions, and 15    other terms and conditions of the insurance policy.16        (4) The benefits for the first 48 hours of initiation 17    of services for an inpatient admission, detoxification or 18    withdrawal management program, or partial hospitalization 19    admission for the treatment of a mental, emotional, 20    nervous, or substance use disorder or condition related to 21    pregnancy or postpartum complications shall be provided 22    without post-service or concurrent review of medical 23    necessity, as the medical necessity for the first 48 hours 24    of such services shall be determined solely by the covered 25    pregnant or postpartum individual's provider. Subject to 26    Sections 370c and 370c.1 of this Code, nothing in this   HB4500- 4 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    paragraph shall prevent an insurer from applying 2    concurrent and post-service utilization review, including 3    the review of medical necessity, case management, 4    experimental and investigational treatments, managed care 5    provisions, and other terms and conditions of the 6    insurance policy, of any inpatient admission, 7    detoxification or withdrawal management program admission, 8    or partial hospitalization admission services for the 9    treatment of a mental, emotional, nervous, or substance 10    use disorder or condition related to pregnancy or 11    postpartum complications received 48 hours after the 12    initiation of such services. If an insurer determines that 13    the services are no longer medically necessary, then the 14    covered person shall have the right to external review 15    pursuant to the requirements of the Health Carrier 16    External Review Act.17        (5) If an insurer determines that continued inpatient 18    care, detoxification or withdrawal management, partial 19    hospitalization, intensive outpatient treatment, or 20    outpatient treatment in a facility is no longer medically 21    necessary, the insurer shall, within 24 hours, provide 22    written notice to the covered pregnant or postpartum 23    individual and the covered pregnant or postpartum 24    individual's provider of its decision and the right to 25    file an expedited internal appeal of the determination. 26    The insurer shall review and make a determination with   HB4500- 5 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    respect to the internal appeal within 24 hours and 2    communicate such determination to the covered pregnant or 3    postpartum individual and the covered pregnant or 4    postpartum individual's provider. If the determination is 5    to uphold the denial, the covered pregnant or postpartum 6    individual and the covered pregnant or postpartum 7    individual's provider have the right to file an expedited 8    external appeal. An independent review organization shall 9    make a determination within 72 hours. If the insurer's 10    determination is upheld and it is determined that 11    continued inpatient care, detoxification or withdrawal 12    management, partial hospitalization, intensive outpatient 13    treatment, or outpatient treatment is not medically 14    necessary, or if the insurer's determination is not 15    appealed, the insurer shall remain responsible for 16    providing benefits for the inpatient care, detoxification 17    or withdrawal management, partial hospitalization, 18    intensive outpatient treatment, or outpatient treatment 19    through the day following the date the determination is 20    made, and the covered pregnant or postpartum individual 21    shall only be responsible for any applicable copayment, 22    deductible, and coinsurance for the stay through that date 23    as applicable under the policy. The covered pregnant or 24    postpartum individual shall not be discharged or released 25    from the inpatient facility, detoxification or withdrawal 26    management, partial hospitalization, intensive outpatient   HB4500- 6 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    treatment, or outpatient treatment until all internal 2    appeals and independent utilization review organization 3    appeals are exhausted. A decision to reverse an adverse 4    determination shall comply with the Health Carrier 5    External Review Act.6        (6) Except as otherwise stated in this subsection (b) 7    and subsection (c), the benefits and cost-sharing shall be 8    provided to the same extent as for any other medical 9    condition covered under the policy.10        (7) The benefits required by paragraphs (2) and (6) of 11    this subsection (b) are to be provided to (i) all covered 12    pregnant or postpartum individuals with a diagnosis of a 13    mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use disorder or 14    condition and (ii) all individuals who have experienced a 15    miscarriage or stillbirth. The presence of additional 16    related or unrelated diagnoses shall not be a basis to 17    reduce or deny the benefits required by this subsection 18    (b). 19        (8) Insurers shall cover all services for pregnancy, 20    postpartum, and newborn care that are rendered by 21    perinatal doulas or licensed certified professional 22    midwives, including home births, home visits, and support 23    during labor, abortion, or miscarriage. Coverage shall 24    include the necessary equipment and medical supplies for a 25    home birth. For home visits by a perinatal doula, not 26    counting any home birth, the policy may limit coverage to   HB4500- 7 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    16 visits before and 16 visits after a birth, miscarriage, 2    or abortion, provided that the policy shall not be 3    required to cover more than $8,000 for doula visits for 4    each pregnancy and subsequent postpartum period. As used 5    in this paragraph (8), "perinatal doula" has the meaning 6    given in subsection (a) of Section 5-18.5 of the Illinois 7    Public Aid Code.8        (9) Coverage for pregnancy, postpartum, and newborn 9    care shall include home visits by lactation consultants 10    and the purchase of breast pumps and breast pump supplies, 11    including such breast pumps, breast pump supplies, 12    breastfeeding supplies, and feeding aids as recommended by 13    the lactation consultant. As used in this paragraph (9), 14    "lactation consultant" means an International 15    Board-Certified Lactation Consultant, a certified 16    lactation specialist with a certification from Lactation 17    Education Consultants, or a certified lactation counselor 18    as defined in subsection (a) of Section 5-18.10 of the 19    Illinois Public Aid Code.20        (9.5) For policies of accident and health insurance 21    amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 22    1, 2027, coverage for pregnancy and postpartum care shall 23    include medically necessary blood pressure monitors for 24    pregnant or postpartum insured persons or beneficiaries. 25        (10) Coverage for postpartum services shall apply for 26    all covered services rendered within the first 12 months   HB4500- 8 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1    after the end of pregnancy, subject to any policy 2    limitation on home visits by a perinatal doula allowed 3    under paragraph (8) of this subsection (b). Nothing in 4    this paragraph (10) shall be construed to require a policy 5    to cover services for an individual who is no longer 6    insured or enrolled under the policy. If an individual 7    becomes insured or enrolled under a new policy, the new 8    policy shall cover the individual consistent with the time 9    period and limitations allowed under this paragraph (10). 10    This paragraph (10) is subject to the requirements of 11    Section 25 of the Managed Care Reform and Patient Rights 12    Act, Section 20 of the Network Adequacy and Transparency 13    Act, and 42 U.S.C. 300gg-113.14    (c) All coverage described in subsection (b), other than 15health care services for home births, shall be provided 16without cost-sharing, except that, for mental health services, 17the cost-sharing prohibition does not apply to inpatient or 18residential services, and, for substance use disorder 19services, the cost-sharing prohibition applies only to levels 20of treatment below and not including Level 3.1 (Clinically 21Managed Low-Intensity Residential), as established by the 22American Society for Addiction Medicine. This subsection does 23not apply to the extent such coverage would disqualify a 24high-deductible health plan from eligibility for a health 25savings account pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal 26Revenue Code.   HB4500- 9 -LRB104 17655 BAB 31086 b1(Source: P.A. 103-650, eff. 1-1-25; 103-701, eff. 1-1-26; 2103-720, eff. 1-1-26; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 38-15-25.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.